Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 TRAFFIC REGULATIONS; MOTOR VEHICLE EQUIPMENT Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.04, is amended to read: 169.04 LOCAL AUTHORITY. (a) The provisions of this chapter deleted text begin shall not be deemed todeleted text end new text begin do notnew text end prevent local authorities, with respect to streets and highways under their jurisdiction, and with the consent of the commissioner, with respect to state trunk highways, within the corporate limits of a municipality, or within the limits of a town in a county in this state now having or which may hereafter have, a population of 500,000 or more, and a land area of not more than 600 square miles, and within the reasonable exercise of the police power from: (1) regulating the standing or parking of vehicles; (2) regulating traffic by means of police officers or traffic-control signals; (3) regulating or prohibiting processions or assemblages on the highways; (4) designating particular highways as one-way roadways and requiring that all vehicles, except emergency vehicles, when on an emergency run, thereon be moved in one specific direction; (5) designating any highway as a through highway and requiring that all vehicles stop before entering or crossing the same, or designating any intersection as a stop intersection, and requiring all vehicles to stop at one or more entrances to such intersections; (6) restricting the use of highways as authorized in sections 169.80 to 169.88; (7) regulating speed limits through the use of a speed safety camera system implemented under section 169.147; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (8) regulating traffic control through the use of a red light camera system implemented under section 169.147new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (9) regulating motor vehicles on the basis of noisenew text end . (b) No ordinance or regulation enacted under paragraph (a), clause (4), (5), or (6), deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end effective until signs giving notice of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end local traffic regulations are posted upon and kept posted upon or at the entrance to the highway or part thereof affected as may be most appropriate. (c) deleted text begin Nodeleted text end new text begin Annew text end ordinance or regulation enacted under paragraph (a), clause (3), or any other provision of law deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin must notnew text end prohibit: (1) the use of motorcycles or vehicles utilizing flashing red lights for the purpose of escorting funeral processions, oversize buildings, heavy equipment, parades or similar processions or assemblages on the highways; or (2) the use of motorcycles or vehicles that are owned by the funeral home and that utilize flashing red lights for the purpose of escorting funeral processions. (d) Ordinances or regulations enacted under paragraph (a), clauses (7) and (8), are effective after August 1, 2025, and before August 1, 2029. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.47, is amended to read: 169.47 UNSAFE EQUIPMENT. Subdivision 1. Misdemeanor; exceptions. (a) It is deleted text begin unlawful and punishable as hereinafterdeleted text end new text begin a violation asnew text end providednew text begin under section 169.89, subdivision 1,new text end for any person to drive or for the owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven on any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is in such unsafe condition as to endanger any persondeleted text begin , or which does not contain those parts or is not at all times equipped with such lamps and other equipment in proper condition and adjustment as required in this chapter, or which is equipped in any manner in violation of this chapter, or for any person to do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required under this chapterdeleted text end . (b) The provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment on vehicles do not apply to implements of husbandry, road machinery, or road rollers except as otherwise provided in this chapter. (c) For purposes of this section, a specialized vehicle resembling a low-slung trailer having a short bed or platform deleted text begin shall be deemed to bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end an implement of husbandry when deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end vehicle is used exclusively to transport implements of husbandrydeleted text begin , provided, however, that no such vehicle shall operatedeleted text end new text begin . A person must not operate a vehicle under this paragraphnew text end on the highway before sunrise or after sunset unless proper lighting is affixed to the implement being drawn. Sec. 3. new text begin [169.482] VEHICLE LIGHTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Times for vehicle lights; general requirements. new text end new text begin (a) Where the term "when vehicle lights are required," "when lighted lamps on vehicles are required," or a similar term is used in this chapter, the referenced requirements apply during the following times: new text end new text begin (1) from sunset to sunrise; new text end new text begin (2) in weather conditions that impair visibility, including but not limited to rain, snow, sleet, hail, smoke, and fog; and new text end new text begin (3) any other periods in which there is not sufficient light to render persons and vehicles on the highway clearly discernible at a distance of 500 feet ahead of the vehicle. new text end new text begin (b) Where the term "when vehicle lights are required," "when lighted lamps on vehicles are required," or a similar term is used in this chapter, the referenced requirements include activating the relevant lamp or light so that it projects a visible light. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Times for vehicle lights; pupil transportation. new text end new text begin For a school bus engaged in pupil transportation, in addition to the periods specified under subdivision 1, vehicle lights including headlamps and taillamps are required from a half hour before sunrise to a half hour after sunset. During the period specified under this subdivision, the operator of a school bus must use the lower beam of a headlamp unless conditions warrant otherwise. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Headlamps. new text end new text begin (a) When vehicle lights are required: new text end new text begin (1) a motor vehicle must be operated with at least one headlamp on the front of the vehicle; and new text end new text begin (2) a commercial motor vehicle must be operated with at least two headlamps, including at least one on each side of the front of the vehicle. new text end new text begin (b) A motorcycle must be operated with not more than four headlamps on the front of the vehicle. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Taillamps. new text end new text begin When vehicle lights are required: new text end new text begin (1) a motor vehicle must be operated with at least one taillamp on the rear of the vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) a vehicle combination must be operated with at least one taillamp on the rear of the last vehicle in the combination; and new text end new text begin (3) a commercial motor vehicle, other than a truck-tractor, manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1960, must be operated with at least two taillamps mounted on the rear and on the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Lamps on other vehicles. new text end new text begin (a) This subdivision does not apply to the operator of a vehicle for which lights or lamp requirements are specifically established under this chapter, including but not limited to a motor vehicle under subdivision 3 or 4 and a bicycle under section 169.222, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (b) When vehicle lights are required, a vehicle, including but not limited to an animal-drawn vehicle, must be operated with: new text end new text begin (1) at least one lamp projecting a light to the front of the vehicle; and new text end new text begin (2) at least one lamp projecting a light to the rear of the vehicle. new text end new text begin (c) A reflector may be used instead of either lamp required under paragraph (b). The reflector must meet the requirements under subdivision 7, paragraph (b), clause (2). new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Auxiliary lights. new text end new text begin (a) A motor vehicle may be operated with one or more auxiliary lights on the front of the vehicle only if: new text end new text begin (1) the highest-intensity portion of the beam of light is aimed: new text end new text begin (i) directly ahead of the vehicle or to the middle of the vehicle; and new text end new text begin (ii) to project below the typical eye level of an oncoming motor vehicle operator at a distance of 100 feet directly to the front; new text end new text begin (2) the beam of light is not so bright as to impede the vision of an oncoming motor vehicle operator; and new text end new text begin (3) the auxiliary light is mounted no more than 42 inches above the ground, except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c). new text end new text begin (b) A motor vehicle equipped with a snowplow blade on the front that obstructs the headlamps required under subdivision 3 may be operated with no more than two auxiliary lights mounted above the height specified under paragraph (a), clause (3). Auxiliary lights authorized under this paragraph must not be used when a snowplow blade is not mounted on the vehicle. new text end new text begin (c) A motor vehicle may be operated with no more than two auxiliary lights mounted above the height specified under paragraph (a), clause (3), if the auxiliary lights are completely covered with an opaque material. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this subdivision, "auxiliary lights" includes but is not limited to auxiliary low-beam headlamps, auxiliary driving lamps, spot lamps, and fog lamps. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reflectors. new text end new text begin (a) A motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer sold as new on or after January 1, 1960, must be operated with at least two reflectors. new text end new text begin (b) The reflectors under this subdivision must be: new text end new text begin (1) mounted as close as practicable to the outermost edges of the vehicle at a height of at least 20 inches and no more than 60 inches above the ground; and new text end new text begin (2) visible from a distance of 300 to 50 feet, or 500 to 50 feet for a commercial motor vehicle, directly to the rear of the vehicle at night, as viewed by a motor vehicle that displays lighted headlamps. new text end new text begin (c) The reflectors under this subdivision may be integrated into the taillamp or mounted separately. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Lower and upper beams. new text end new text begin (a) The operator of a motor vehicle who is within 1,000 feet of an oncoming motor vehicle must use the lower beam of a headlamp. The lower beam and any other lamp or light directed to the front of the vehicle must be aimed so that the highest-intensity portion of the beam of light projects below the typical eye level of an oncoming vehicle operator. new text end new text begin (b) Except when engaged in the act of overtaking and passing, the operator of a motor vehicle who follows another vehicle within 200 feet to the rear must not use the upper beam of a headlamp. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Light standards and measurement. new text end new text begin (a) When lighted, the beam of light from a headlamp, lamp, or light that is required to be directed to the front of a vehicle under subdivision 3 or 5 must: new text end new text begin (1) be aimed in a manner and have sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a safe distance in advance of the vehicle at night; new text end new text begin (2) be aimed so that the highest-intensity portion is directly ahead of the vehicle or to the middle of the vehicle; and new text end new text begin (3) project a white light visible from a distance of at least 500 feet directly to the front of the vehicle. new text end new text begin (b) When lighted, a taillamp, lamp, or light that is required to be directed to the rear of a vehicle under subdivision 4 or 5 must project a red light visible from a distance of at least 500 feet directly to the rear of the vehicle. new text end new text begin (c) Unless explicitly provided otherwise, a condition or requirement that relates to visibility and distance of a lighted lamp, a light, or a reflector for a vehicle is measured: new text end new text begin (1) on a straight, level, unlighted highway under normal atmospheric conditions; and new text end new text begin (2) to the center of the lamp, light, or reflector. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Certain violations; negligence. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 169.96, a violation of a vehicle lighting requirement under this chapter that occurs as a result of a condition specified in subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), is not negligence per se or prima facie evidence of negligence. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.55, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Implement of husbandry. (a) deleted text begin At the times when lighted lamps on vehiclesdeleted text end new text begin When vehicle lightsnew text end are required: (1) every self-propelled implement of husbandry must be equipped with at least one lamp displaying a white light to the front, and at least one lamp displaying a red light to the rear; (2) every self-propelled implement of husbandry must also display two red reflectors visible to the rear; (3) every combination of a self-propelled and towed implement of husbandry must be equipped with at least one lamp mounted to indicate as nearly as practicable the extreme left projection of the combination and displaying a white or amber light to the front and a red or amber light to the rear of the self-propelled implement of husbandry; and (4) the last unit of every combination of implements of husbandry must display two red reflectors visible to the rear. new text begin (b) An implement of husbandry is not subject to the requirements under section 169.482, subdivisions 4 and 7, if the vehicle: new text end new text begin (1) is towed by a motor vehicle at a speed of not more than 30 miles per hour; new text end new text begin (2) displays a slow-moving vehicle emblem; and new text end new text begin (3) complies with paragraph (a), clause (4). new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The reflectorsnew text begin under this subdivisionnew text end must be deleted text begin of the type approved for use upon commercial vehicles. The reflectors must bedeleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end mounted as close as practicable to the extreme edges of the implement of husbandrydeleted text begin . The reflectors must bedeleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2)new text end reflex reflectors that are visible at night from all distances within 600 feet to 100 feet when directly in front of lawful lower beams of headlamps. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.57, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Stoplightsdeleted text end new text begin Stop lampsnew text end . deleted text begin (a) Any vehicle may be equipped and when required under this chapter, shall be equipped with at least two stop lamps on the rear which shall emit a red or yellow light and which shall be actuated upon application of the service (foot) brake and which may, but need not be, incorporated with the tail lamps and which shall be plainly visible and understandable from a distance of 100 feet to the rear during normal sunlight and at night. deleted text end new text begin (a) A motor vehicle must be operated with at least one stop lamp on the rear. new text end new text begin (b) A stop lamp under this subdivision must: new text end new text begin (1) activate upon application of the service (foot) brake; and new text end new text begin (2) when activated, emit a red or yellow light that is visible from a distance of at least 100 feet directly to the rear of the vehicle in both normal sunlight and at night. new text end new text begin (c) A stop lamp under this subdivision may be integrated into the taillamp or mounted separately. new text end deleted text begin (b) No person shalldeleted text end new text begin (d) A person must notnew text end sell or offer for sale deleted text begin or operate on the highwaysdeleted text end any motor vehicle registered in this state and manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1960, unless it is equipped withnew text begin (1)new text end at least two stop lamps meeting the requirements of this subdivisiondeleted text begin , except thatdeleted text end new text begin , or (2) fornew text end a motorcycle, deleted text begin motor-driven cycledeleted text end new text begin motorized bicyclenew text end , or truck-tractor deleted text begin manufactured or assembled after said date shall be equipped withdeleted text end new text begin ,new text end at least one stop lamp meeting the requirements of this subdivision. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.57, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Turn signal. deleted text begin (a) Any vehicle may be equipped, and when required under this chapter shall be equipped, with a lamp or lamps or mechanical signal device of such color as may be approved by the commissioner of public safety and capable of clearly indicating any intention to turn either to the right or to the left and shall be visible and understandable during both daytime and nighttime from a distance of 100 feet both to the front and rear. deleted text end new text begin (a) When activated, a turn signal equipped on a vehicle must: new text end new text begin (1) be capable of clearly indicating an intention of the vehicle operator to turn either to the right or to the left; and new text end new text begin (2) emit a light that is visible from a distance of at least 100 feet directly to the front and to the rear of the vehicle in both normal sunlight and at night. new text end (b) It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale any new motor vehicledeleted text begin , excepting motorcycles, motor scooters, and bicycles with motor attached,deleted text end unless it is equipped with turn signals meeting the requirements of this chapternew text begin , except for a motorcycle or motorized bicyclenew text end . Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.64, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Colored light. (a) Unless otherwise authorized by the commissioner of public safety, deleted text begin no vehicle shall be equipped, nor shall any person drivedeleted text end new text begin a person must not operatenew text end or move any vehicle or equipment upon any highway with any lamp or device displaying a red light or any colored light other than those required or permitted in this chapter. (b) A vehicle manufactured for use as an emergency vehicle may display and use colored lights that are not otherwise required or permitted in this chapter, deleted text begin provided thatdeleted text end new text begin ifnew text end the vehicle is owned and operated deleted text begin according todeleted text end new text begin as provided undernew text end section 168.10, is owned and operated solely as a collector's item and not for general transportation purposes, and is registered under section 168.10, subdivision 1a, 1b, 1c, 1d, 1g, or 1h. A person may not activate the colored lights authorized under this paragraph on streets or highways except as part of a parade or other special event. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.71, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Prohibitions generally; exceptionsdeleted text end new text begin General visibilitynew text end . deleted text begin (a) A person shall not drive or operate any motor vehicle with: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) a windshield cracked or discolored to an extent to limit or obstruct proper vision; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) any objects suspended between the driver and the windshield, other than: deleted text end deleted text begin (i) sun visors; deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) rearview mirrors; deleted text end deleted text begin (iii) driver feedback and safety monitoring equipment when mounted immediately behind, slightly above, or slightly below the rearview mirror; deleted text end deleted text begin (iv) global positioning systems or navigation systems when mounted or located near the bottommost portion of the windshield; deleted text end deleted text begin (v) electronic toll collection devices; and deleted text end deleted text begin (vi) an identifying device as provided in section 169.58, subdivision 5, when the device is mounted or located near the bottommost portion of the windshield; or deleted text end deleted text begin (3) any sign, poster, or other nontransparent material upon the front windshield, sidewings, or side or rear windows of the vehicle, other than a certificate or other paper required to be so displayed by law or authorized by the state director of the Division of Emergency Management or the commissioner of public safety. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) Paragraph (a), clauses (2) and (3), do not apply to law enforcement vehicles. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) Paragraph (a), clause (2), does not apply to authorized emergency vehicles. deleted text end new text begin (a) A person must not operate a motor vehicle in which: new text end new text begin (1) the windshield is in an unsafe condition that poses a danger of injury to vehicle occupants; new text end new text begin (2) the operator's clear view through the windshield, or a side window on either side of the driver's seat, is materially obstructed or substantially reduced in a manner that poses a hazard to safe operation; or new text end new text begin (3) nontransparent material is affixed to a side window or rear window, except for a law enforcement vehicle or as otherwise authorized by law. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, safe operation under paragraph (a), clause (2), includes but is not limited to the operator's ability to readily identify the roadway, official traffic-control devices, vehicles in motion or a part of traffic, stopped or parked vehicles, and vulnerable road users. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.71, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Windshield wipers. new text end new text begin (a) The operator of a motor vehicle must use windshield wipers when precipitation or other substance is on the outside of the windshield in a manner that materially obstructs or substantially reduces the operator's clear view through the windshield. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of paragraph (a), each windshield wiper: new text end new text begin (1) constituted into the vehicle design by the manufacturer must operate; and new text end new text begin (2) must be in reasonable working condition. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.71, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Glazing material; prohibitions. A person must not deleted text begin drive ordeleted text end operate any motor vehicle required to be registered in the state of Minnesota upon any street or highway deleted text begin under the following conditionsdeleted text end new text begin ifnew text end : (1) deleted text begin whendeleted text end the windshield is composed of, covered by, or treated with any material deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end has the effect of deleted text begin making the windshield more reflective or in any other waydeleted text end reducing light transmittance through the windshield; (2) deleted text begin whendeleted text end any window on the vehicle is composed of, covered by, or treated with any material that has a highly reflective or mirrored appearance;new text begin ornew text end (3) deleted text begin whendeleted text end any side window deleted text begin or rear windowdeleted text end new text begin on either side of the driver's seatnew text end is composed of or treated with any material deleted text begin so as to obstructdeleted text end new text begin that:new text end new text begin (i) materially obstructsnew text end or substantially deleted text begin reducedeleted text end new text begin reducesnew text end the driver's clear view through the window deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (ii)new text end has a light transmittance of less than 50 percent plus or minus three percent in the visible light rangenew text begin ;new text end or new text begin (iii) hasnew text end a luminous reflectance of more than 20 percent plus or minus three percentdeleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (4) when any material has been applied after August 1, 1985, to any motor vehicle window without an accompanying permanent marking which indicates the percent of transmittance and the percent of reflectance afforded by the material. The marking must be in a manner so as not to obscure vision and be readable when installed on the vehicle. deleted text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.71, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Glazing material; exceptions. (a) Subdivision 4 does not apply to glazing materials that: (1) have not been modified since the original installation, nor to original replacement windows and windshields, that were originally installed or replaced in conformity with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 205;new text begin ornew text end (2) are required to satisfy prescription or medical needs, provided: (i) the vehicle's driver or a passenger possesses a prescription or a physician's statement of medical need; (ii) the prescription or statement specifically states the minimum percentage that light transmittance may be reduced to satisfy the prescription or medical needs of the patient; and (iii) the prescription or statement contains an expiration date, which must be no more than two years after the date the prescription or statement was issueddeleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (b) The requirements under subdivision 4, clause (3), do not apply to glazing materials thatnew text end are applied todeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (i) the rear windows of a pickup truck as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 26; deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) the rear windows or the side windows on either side behind the driver's seat of a van as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 40; deleted text end deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end the side deleted text begin and reardeleted text end windows ofnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end a vehicle used to transport human remains by a funeral establishment holding a license under section 149A.50; deleted text begin (iv) the side and rear windows ofdeleted text end new text begin (2)new text end a limousine as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 15; or deleted text begin (v) the rear and side windows ofdeleted text end new text begin (3)new text end a police vehicle. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end For the purposes of paragraph (a), clause (2), a driver of a vehicle may rely on a prescription or physician's statement of medical need issued to a person not present in the vehicle if: (1) the prescription or physician's statement of medical need is issued to (i) the driver's parent, child, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, or spouse, or (ii) a person for whom the driver is a personal care attendant; (2) the prescription or physician's statement of medical need specifies the make, model, and license plate of one or two vehicles that will have tinted windows; and (3) the driver is in possession of the prescription or physician's statement of medical need. Sec. 12. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin (a) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 169.48; 169.49; 169.50, subdivisions 1 and 3; 169.55, subdivision 1; 169.56; 169.61; 169.63; and 169.71, subdivisions 2 and 3, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin (b) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 169.219; 169.50, subdivision 2; 169.57, subdivision 3; 169.59, subdivisions 1 and 2; 169.65; 169.66; 169.69; 169.693; 169.974, subdivision 7; and 169.98, subdivision 5, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end ARTICLE 2 MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION AND LICENSE PLATES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.09, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Registration required. No trailer or motor vehicle, except as is exempted by section 168.012, may be used or operated upon the public streets or highways of the state in any calendar year until it is registered as provided in this sectiondeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin andnew text end the motor vehiclenew text begin registrationnew text end tax andnew text begin all othernew text end fees as provided in this chapter are paiddeleted text begin , and the number plates issued for the trailer or motor vehicle are displayed on itdeleted text end . No trailer or motor vehicle, except as provided by section 168.012, which for any reason is not subject to taxation as provided in this chapter, may be used or operated upon the public streets or highways of this state until it is registered as provided in this section deleted text begin and displays number plates as required by this chapter, except that the purchaser of a new trailer or motor vehicle may operate it without plates if the permit authorized by section 168.091 or 168.092 is displayeddeleted text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.12, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Plates; design, visibility, periods of issuance. (a) The commissioner, upon approval and payment, must issue to the applicant the plates required by this chapter, bearing the state name and an assigned vehicle registration number. The number assigned by the commissioner may be a combination of a letter or sign with figures. The color of the plates and the color of the abbreviation of the state name and the number assigned must be in marked contrast. The plates must be lettered, spaced, or distinguished to suitably indicate the registration of the vehicle according to the rules of the commissioner. (b) When a vehicle is registered on the basis of total gross weight, the plates issued must clearly indicate by letters or other suitable insignia the maximum gross weight for which the tax has been paid. (c) Plates issued to a noncommercial vehicle must bear the inscription "noncommercial" unless the vehicle is displaying a special plate authorized and issued under this chapter. (d) A one-ton pickup truck that is used for commercial purposes and is subject to section 168.185, is eligible to display special plates as authorized and issued under this chapter. (e) The plates must be so treated as to be at least 100 times brighter than the conventional painted deleted text begin numberdeleted text end new text begin licensenew text end plates. When properly mounted on an unlighted vehicle, the plates, when viewed from a vehicle equipped with standard headlights, must be visible for a distance of not less than 1,500 feet and readable for a distance of not less than 110 feet. (f) The commissioner must issue plates for the following periods: (1) New plates issued pursuant to section 168.012, subdivision 1, must be issued to a vehicle for as long as the vehicle is owned by the exempt agency and the plate is not transferable from one vehicle to another but the plate may be transferred with the vehicle from one tax-exempt agency to another. (2) Plates issued for passenger automobiles must be issued for a seven-year period. All plates issued under this paragraph must be replaced if they are seven years old or older at the time of registration renewal or will become so during the registration period. (3) Plates issued under sections 168.053 and 168.27, subdivisions 16 and 17, must be for a seven-year period. (4) Plates issued under subdivisions 2c and 2d and sections 168.123, 168.1235, and 168.1255 must be issued for the life of the veteran under section 169.79. (5) Plates for any vehicle not specified in clauses (1) to (3) must be issued for the life of the vehicle. (g) deleted text begin In a year in which plates are not issued, the commissioner must issue for each registration a sticker to designate the year of registration. This sticker must show the year or years for which the sticker is issued, and is valid only for that period.deleted text end The plates deleted text begin and stickersdeleted text end issued for a vehicle may not be transferred to another vehicle during thenew text begin registrationnew text end period for which the deleted text begin sticker isdeleted text end new text begin plates arenew text end issued, except when issued for a vehicle registered under section 168.187. (h) Despite any other provision of this subdivision, plates issued to a vehicle used for behind-the-wheel instruction in a driver education course in a public school may be transferred to another vehicle used for the same purpose without payment of any additional fee. The public school must notify the commissioner of each transfer of plates under this paragraph. The commissioner may prescribe a format for notification. (i) In lieu of plates required under this section, the commissioner must issue a registration number identical to the federally issued tail number assigned to a roadable aircraft. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.79, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Registrationdeleted text end new text begin Platesnew text end required. deleted text begin No person shall operate, drive, or park a motor vehicle on any highway unless the vehicle is registered in accordance with the laws of this state and has the number plates or permit confirming that valid registration or operating authority has been obtained, except as provided in sections 168.10 and 168.12, subdivision 2f, as assigned to it by the commissioner of public safety, conspicuously displayed thereon in a manner that the view of any plate or permit is not obstructed. deleted text end new text begin (a) A person must not operate or park a motor vehicle, or use a trailer, on a highway unless the vehicle displays the license plates issued by the commissioner of public safety or as otherwise provided under sections 168.10 and 168.12, subdivision 2f. A person may operate the vehicle without plates if a permit is displayed as provided under section 168.09, subdivision 7, 168.091, or 168.092. new text end new text begin (b)new text end A plate issued under section 168.27 deleted text begin or a permit issued under chapter 168deleted text end may be displayed on a vehicle deleted text begin in conjunction withdeleted text end new text begin that hasnew text end expired registrationnew text begin ,new text end whether or not deleted text begin itdeleted text end new text begin the vehiclenew text end displays the license plate deleted text begin to whichdeleted text end new text begin issued in conjunction withnew text end the last registration deleted text begin was issueddeleted text end . new text begin (c) Unless specifically established otherwise, a validation sticker that indicates the date of expiration of vehicle registration is not required but may be affixed or displayed on a license plate at the discretion of the vehicle owner. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.79, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Plate fastened and visible. deleted text begin All platesdeleted text end new text begin (a) A license platenew text end must benew text begin :new text end (1) securely fastened so as to prevent deleted text begin them fromdeleted text end swingingdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (2) displayed horizontallynew text begin , or as provided under subdivision 3,new text end with the identifying numbers and letters facing outward from the vehicledeleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin ;new text end (3) mounted in the upright positionnew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) conspicuously displayed in a manner so that the view of the plate is not obstructednew text end . new text begin (b)new text end The deleted text begin person driving thedeleted text end new text begin operator of anew text end motor vehicle deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end keep deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin each licensenew text end plate legible and unobstructed and free from grease, dust, or other blurring material so that the lettering is plainly visible at all times. It is unlawful to cover any assigned letters and numbers or the name of the state of origin of a license plate with any material whatever, including any clear or colorless material that affects the plate's visibility or reflectivity. Sec. 5. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 168.37, subdivision 3; and 169.79, subdivision 8, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end ARTICLE 3 TRAFFIC REGULATIONS; CONFORMING CHANGES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.045, subdivision 7a, is amended to read: Subd. 7a. Required equipment on mini trucks. Notwithstanding sections deleted text begin 169.48deleted text end new text begin 169.482new text end to 169.68, or any other law, a mini truck may be operated under permit on designated roadways if it is equipped with: (1) at least two headlamps; (2) at least two taillamps; (3) front and rear turn-signal lamps; (4) an exterior mirror mounted on the driver's side of the vehicle and either (i) an exterior mirror mounted on the passenger's side of the vehicle or (ii) an interior mirror; (5) a windshield; (6) a seat belt for the driver and front passenger; and (7) a parking brake. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.19, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Signaling methods. The signals deleted text begin hereindeleted text end required deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin under this section mustnew text end be given either by means of the hand and arm or by deleted text begin a signal lamp or signal device of a type approved by the commissioner of public safety, butdeleted text end new text begin the appropriate stop lamp or turn signal as provided under section 169.57.new text end When a vehicle is so constructed or loaded that a hand and arm signal would not be visible in normal sunlight, and at night both to the front and rear of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end vehicle, then the signals must be given by deleted text begin such a lamp or devicedeleted text end new text begin the stop lamp or turn signalnew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.222, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Bicycle equipment. (a) No person shall operate a bicycle at nighttime unless the bicycle or its operator is equipped with (1) a lamp which emits a white light visible from a distance of at least 500 feet to the front; and (2) a red reflector deleted text begin of a type approved by the Department of Public Safetydeleted text end which is visible from all distances from 100 feet to 600 feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of headlamps on a motor vehicle. A bicycle equipped with lamps that are visible from a distance of at least 500 feet from both the front and the rear is deemed to fully comply with this paragraph. (b) No person may operate a bicycle at any time when there is not sufficient light to render persons and vehicles on the highway clearly discernible at a distance of 500 feet ahead unless the bicycle or its operator is equipped with reflective surfaces that shall be visible during the hours of darkness from 600 feet when viewed in front of lawful lower beams of headlamps on a motor vehicle. The reflective surfaces shall include reflective materials on each side of each pedal to indicate their presence from the front or the rear and with a minimum of 20 square inches of reflective material on each side of the bicycle or its operator. Any bicycle equipped with side reflectors as required by regulations for new bicycles prescribed by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission shall be considered to meet the requirements for side reflectorization contained in this subdivision. (c) A bicycle may be equipped with a front lamp that emits a white flashing signal, or a rear lamp that emits a red flashing signal, or both. (d) A bicycle may be equipped with tires having studs, spikes, or other protuberances designed to increase traction. (e) No person shall operate a bicycle unless it is equipped with a rear brake or front and rear brakes which will enable the operator to make a braked wheel skid on dry, level, clean pavement. A bicycle equipped with a direct or fixed gear that can make the rear wheel skid on dry, level, clean pavement shall be deemed to fully comply with this paragraph. (f) A bicycle may be equipped with a horn or bell designed to alert motor vehicles, other bicycles, and pedestrians of the bicycle's presence. (g) No person shall operate upon a highway any two-wheeled bicycle equipped with handlebars so raised that the operator must elevate the hands above the level of the shoulders in order to grasp the normal steering grip area. (h) No person shall operate upon a highway any bicycle which is of such a size as to prevent the operator from stopping the bicycle, supporting it with at least one foot on the highway surface and restarting in a safe manner. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.225, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Required lighting equipment. new text begin When vehicle lights are required as provided under section 169.482, subdivision 1, new text end a motorized foot scooter must be deleted text begin equippeddeleted text end new text begin operatednew text end with a headlight and a taillight deleted text begin that comply with standards established by the commissioner of public safety if the vehicle is operated under conditions when vehicle lights are required by lawdeleted text end . Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.541, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Exemption. Sections 84.87, 84.928, 86B.511, and deleted text begin 169.48 to 169.65deleted text end new text begin 169.482 to 169.64new text end , relating to lighting of vehicles and watercraft, do not apply to a licensed peace officer, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), while operating a motor vehicle or watercraft owned, leased, or otherwise the property of the state or a political subdivision, in the performance of the officer's law enforcement duties if the officer's conduct is reasonable and is consistent with the standards adopted under subdivision 2, and if the officer reasonably believes that operating the vehicle without lights is necessary under the circumstances to investigate a criminal violation or suspected criminal violation of state laws, rules, or orders or local laws, ordinances, or regulations. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.58, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Animal-drawn vehicles. (a) An animal-drawn vehicle must be equipped with an identification lamp or lamps that indicate the vehicle's presence and are visible from a distance of at least 500 feet from both the front and the rear. The lighting requirement under this subdivision may be met using a lamp powered by energy generated from the vehicle's movement. (b) This subdivision does not apply to an animal-drawn vehicle that: (1) operates exclusively between the hours of sunrise and sunset and never during periods deleted text begin of reduced visibility, inclement weather, or insufficient lightdeleted text end new text begin when vehicle lights are required as provided under section 169.482, subdivision 1new text end ; or (2) never operates on a public roadway. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.59, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Flashing deleted text begin warningdeleted text end new text begin hazardnew text end light. deleted text begin Any vehicle may be equipped withdeleted text end new text begin (a) The operator of a vehicle may usenew text end lamps deleted text begin which may be useddeleted text end for the purpose of warning the operators of other vehicles of the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking, or passingdeleted text begin , and when so equipped may display suchdeleted text end new text begin . A lamp authorized under this subdivision may display anew text end warning in addition to any other warning signals deleted text begin required bydeleted text end new text begin provided undernew text end this section or section deleted text begin 169.50, subdivision 1 or 3deleted text end new text begin 169.482, subdivision 4, 6, or 7new text end ; deleted text begin 169.56, subdivision 1, 2, 3, or 4;deleted text end 169.57, subdivision 1; or 169.64, subdivision 3. new text begin (b)new text end The lamps used to display deleted text begin such warningsdeleted text end new text begin a warningnew text end to the front deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be mounted at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end display simultaneous flashing white or amber lights, or any shade of color between white and amber. The lamps used to display deleted text begin such warningsdeleted text end new text begin a warningnew text end to the rear deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be mounted at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end show simultaneously flashing amber or red lights, or any shade of color between amber and red. Instead of a pair of lamps that flash simultaneously, either one or two strobe lights or rotating beacon lights with an amber or yellow lens may be used both to the front and rear of the vehicle. These warning lights deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be visible from a distance of not less than 500 feet deleted text begin under normal atmospheric conditionsdeleted text end at night. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.62, is amended to read: 169.62 CERTAIN LIGHTS PERMITTED ON OLD MOTOR VEHICLES. new text begin (a) new text end Headlamps arranged to provide a single distribution of light not supplemented by auxiliary deleted text begin driving lamps shall bedeleted text end new text begin lights arenew text end permitted on motor vehicles manufactured and sold prior to January 1, 1938, in lieu of multiple-beam road-lighting equipment deleted text begin herein specifieddeleted text end if the single distribution of light complies with the deleted text begin followingdeleted text end requirements deleted text begin and limitations:deleted text end new text begin under this section.new text end deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end The headlamps deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be so aimed that when the vehicle is fully loaded none of the high-intensity portion of the lamp beam rises above a horizontal plane passing through the headlamp centers parallel to the level surface upon which the vehicle stands, and in no case higher than 42 inches above the level on which the vehicle stands at a distance of 75 and more feet ahead. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The intensity deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be sufficient to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least 200 feet. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.64, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Bright light. Any lighted lamp or illuminating device upon a motor vehicle, other than deleted text begin a headlamp, a spot lamp, or an auxiliary driving lampdeleted text end new text begin as provided under section 169.482, subdivisions 3, 5, and 6new text end , deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end projects a beam of light of an intensity greater than 300-candle power, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be so directed that no part of the beam will strike the level of the roadway on which the vehicle stands at a distance of more than 75 feet from the vehicle. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.64, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. White light. (a) It is unlawful to project a white light at the rear of a vehicle while traveling on any street or highway, except: (1) for a vehicle moving in reverse; (2) for a school bus equipped with a supplemental warning system under section 169.4503, subdivision 31; (3) for a strobe lamp as provided under subdivision 8; deleted text begin (4) as required for license plate illumination under section 169.50, subdivision 2; deleted text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end as provided in section 169.59, subdivision 4; and deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end as otherwise provided in this subdivision. (b) A lighting device mounted on top of a vehicle engaged in deliveries to residences may project a white light to the rear if the sign projects one or more additional colors to the rear. (c) An authorized emergency vehicle may display an oscillating, alternating, or rotating white light used in connection with an oscillating, alternating, or rotating red light when responding to emergency calls. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.64, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Flashing amber light. (a) Any service vehicle may be equipped with a flashing amber lamp deleted text begin of a type approved by the commissioner of public safetydeleted text end . (b)new text begin The operator ofnew text end a service vehicle deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not display the lighted lamp authorized under paragraph (a) when traveling upon the highway or at any other time except at the scene of a disabled vehicle or while engaged in snow removal or road maintenance. (c)new text begin The operator ofnew text end a self-propelled implement of husbandry may display the lighted lamp authorized under paragraph (a) at any time. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.64, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Cover for lamp or reflector. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), it is prohibited for any person to: (1) equip a motor vehicle with any equipment or material that covers a headlamp, deleted text begin tail lampdeleted text end new text begin taillampnew text end , or reflectornew text begin that is required under this chapternew text end ; or (2) operate a motor vehicle fitted with or otherwise having equipment or material that covers a headlamp, deleted text begin tail lampdeleted text end new text begin taillampnew text end , or reflectornew text begin that is required under this chapternew text end . (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to: (1) any manufacturer's original equipment or material; (2) any equipment or material that is clear and colorless; or (3) the covering for auxiliary lights deleted text begin requireddeleted text end under section deleted text begin 169.56deleted text end new text begin 169.482, subdivision 6new text end . Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.999, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authority. (a) Except for peace officers employed by the state patrol, prior to a peace officer issuing an administrative citation under this section, the governing body for the local unit of government that employs the peace officer must pass a resolution that: (1) authorizes issuance of administrative citations; (2) obligates the local unit of government to provide a neutral third party to hear and rule on challenges to administrative citations; and (3) bars peace officers from issuing administrative citations in violation of this section. (b) A peace officer may issue an administrative citation to a vehicle operator who: (1) violates section 169.14, and the violation consists of a speed under ten miles per hour in excess of the lawful speed limit; (2) fails to obey a stop line in violation of section 169.30; or (3) operates a vehicle that is in violation of sections 169.46 to 169.68 and deleted text begin 169.69deleted text end new text begin 169.70new text end to 169.75. (c) The authority to issue an administrative citation is exclusively limited to those offenses listed in this subdivision. (d) A peace officer who issues an administrative citation for the infraction of speeding under ten miles per hour over the speed limit must use the actual speed a violator's vehicle was traveling at the time of the infraction and may not reduce the recorded speed for purposes of qualifying the offense for an administrative citation. An administrative citation issued for speeding must list the actual speed the vehicle was traveling at the time of the infraction. (e) A local unit of government shall notify the commissioner of public safety after it passes a resolution described in paragraph (a). ARTICLE 4 MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION; CONFORMING CHANGES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.012, subdivision 1c, is amended to read: Subd. 1c. Payment of administrative, plate, and filing fee. The annual administrative fee for a tax-exempt vehicle under this section is $5. The license plate fee for a tax-exempt vehicle, except a trailer, is $10 for two plates per vehicle, payable only on the first tax-exempt registration of the vehicle. The registration period for a tax-exempt vehicle is biennial. The administrative fee is due on March 1 biennially and payable the preceding January 1deleted text begin , with validating stickers issued at time of paymentdeleted text end . Replacement plates are subject to the fees in section 168.12. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.012, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Vehicles registered by certain veterans. (a) A passenger automobile, one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle registered by a veteran with a total service-connected disability, as defined in section 171.01, subdivision 51, is not subject to: (1) registration taxes under this chapter; (2) administrative fees imposed under subdivision 1c; (3) filing fees and surcharges imposed under section 168.33, subdivision 7; or (4) plate deleted text begin and validation stickerdeleted text end fees imposed under this chapter, including but not limited to: (i) fees under section 168.12, subdivision 5; (ii) fees identified in any section authorizing special plates; and (iii) transfer fees. (b) The exemptions under this subdivision apply to a motor vehicle that is jointly registered by a qualifying veteran and a spouse or domestic partner. (c) The fees identified under paragraph (a), clause (4), do not include: (1) a fee for personalized plates under section 168.12, subdivision 2a; or (2) a required contribution or donation for a special plate, including but not limited to a contribution under sections 168.1255, subdivision 1, clause (6); 168.1258, subdivision 1, clause (4); 168.1259, subdivision 2, new text begin paragraph (a), new text end clause (5); 168.1287, subdivision 1, clause (5); 168.129, subdivision 1, clause (5); 168.1295, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (5); 168.1296, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (5); and 168.1299, subdivision 1, clause (3). (d) A qualifying veteran may register no more than two motor vehicles at the same time with the exemptions under this subdivision. Nothing in this paragraph prevents registration of additional motor vehicles as otherwise provided in this chapter. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.0135, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authorization. (a) The commissioner, in consultation with deputy registrars, must establish a process to implement, locate, and install self-service kiosks that may be used for passenger vehicle and motorcycle registration renewals. The commissioner must establish reasonable performance, security, technical, and financial standards to approve a vendor. Self-service kiosks authorized by this section must: (1) allow a customer to renew a passenger vehicle or motorcycle registration pursuant to section 168.013 without assistance of a deputy registrar; (2) collect the appropriate annual contribution for a special license plate; (3) process requests for duplicate license plates, except that the self-service kiosk must not process any request for a special plate that requires documentation to prove eligibility to receive that type of plate;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (4) dispense license plate registration renewal stickers to the applicant at the time of the application; and deleted text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end display the contact phone number and email address of the deputy registrar's office that is responsible for the self-service kiosk. (b) This section only applies to deputy registrars appointed pursuant to section 168.33, subdivision 2. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.017, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Registration period extension for leased vehicle. (a) Notwithstanding subdivisions 3 and 4, a person leasing for at least one year a vehicle registered under this section may obtain an extension of the motor vehicle's registration period for the unexpired portion of the lease period, for a period not to exceed 11 months beyond the expiration of the registration period. (b) In order to obtain an extension under this subdivision a lessee must: (1) apply to the registrar on a form the registrar prescribes; (2) submit to the registrar a copy of the lease; (3) pay an administrative fee of $5; and (4) pay a tax of 1/12 of the tax for the registration period being extended for each month of the extension. (c) On an applicant's compliance with paragraph (b) deleted text begin the registrar shall issue the applicant a license plate tab or sticker designating the new month of expiration of the registration.deleted text end new text begin ,new text end the extended registration expires on the tenth day of the month following the deleted text begin monthdeleted text end designated deleted text begin on the tab or stickerdeleted text end new text begin month of expirationnew text end . (d) All fees collected under paragraph (b), clause (3), must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1. Taxes collected under paragraph (b), clause (4), must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.12, subdivision 2f, is amended to read: Subd. 2f. Original license plates. (a) On application of the owner and in lieu of issuing plates under subdivision 1 to a motor vehicle registered and taxed as a passenger automobile, the commissioner may assign to the motor vehicle original Minnesota registration plates issued in the same year as the model year of the motor vehicle, if (1) the original plates are at least 20 years old, (2) the owner of the motor vehicle has the original plates in possession at the time of the application, and (3) the owner provides the plate number to the commissioner. (b) Plates deleted text begin displayeddeleted text end under this subdivision, including stickers applied to the plates, must be clearly legible and must be displayed on the motor vehicle. (c) The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not assign the registration number on the original plates to the motor vehicle if the commissioner determines that the number on the original plate is identical to the number on any plate in the current or reserved numbering system used by the commissioner. (d) Despite subdivision 1, an original plate whose number has been assigned under this subdivision may be displayed for as long as the plates, including tabs and stickers on the plates, are clearly legible and the number is not subsequently used by the commissioner as a plate number in a registration numbering system. deleted text begin (e) Despite subdivision 1, original plates assigned under this subdivision need not bear a tab or sticker to indicate the month or year of registration if the motor vehicle carries the registration certificate issued under section 168.11 at all times when the motor vehicle is operated on the public highways. deleted text end deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The commissioner may charge a fee for receiving an application and assigning original plate numbers. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.12, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Additional fee. (a) In addition to any fee otherwise authorized or any tax otherwise imposed upon any vehicle, the payment of which is required as a condition to the issuance of any plate or plates, the commissioner shall impose the fee specified in paragraph (b) that is calculated to cover the cost of manufacturing and issuing the plate or plates, except for plates issued to disabled veterans as defined in section 168.031 and plates issued pursuant to section 168.124, 168.125, or 168.27, subdivisions 16 and 17, for passenger automobiles. The commissioner shall issue graphic design plates only for vehicles registered pursuant to section 168.017 and recreational vehicles registered pursuant to section 168.013, subdivision 1g. (b) Unless otherwise specified or exempted by statute, the following plate and deleted text begin validationdeleted text end sticker fees apply for the original, duplicate, or replacement issuance of a plate in a plate year: License Plate Single Double Regular and Disability $ 13.50 $ 15.50 Special $ 13.50 $ 15.50 Personalized (Replacement) $ 13.50 $ 15.50 Collector Category $ 13.50 $ 15.50 Emergency Vehicle Display $ 3.00 $ 6.00 Utility Trailer Self-Adhesive $ 2.50 Vertical Motorcycle Plate $ 100.00 NA Replacement Dealer Plates $ 5.25 Replacement Tax Exempt Plates $ 5.25 Stickers new text begin Original or new text end Duplicate deleted text begin yeardeleted text end $ 1.50 $ 1.50 International Fuel Tax Agreement $ 2.50 (c) For vehicles that require two of the categories in paragraph (b), the registrar shall only charge the higher of the two fees and not a combined total. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.123, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. General requirements; fees. (a) On payment of a fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of two plates, or for a single plate in the case of a motorcycle plate, payment of the registration tax required by law, and compliance with other applicable laws relating to vehicle registration and licensing, as applicable, the commissioner shall issue: (1) special veteran's plates to an applicant who served in the active military service in a branch of the armed forces of the United States or of a nation or society allied with the United States in conducting a foreign war, was discharged under honorable conditions, and is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, recreational motor vehicle, or one-ton pickup truck, but which is not a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 16; or (2) a veteran's special motorcycle plate as described in subdivision 2, paragraph (a), (e), (f), (h), (i), (j), or (m), or another special plate designed by the commissioner to an applicant who is a registered owner of a motorcycle and meets the criteria listed in this paragraph and in subdivision 2, paragraph (a), (e), (f), (h), (i), (j), or (m). Plates issued under this clause must be the same size as regular motorcycle plates. Special motorcycle license plates issued under this clause are not subject to section 168.1293. (b) The additional fee is payable for each set of veteran's platesdeleted text begin , is payable onlydeleted text end when the plates are issueddeleted text begin , and is not payable in a year in which stickers are issued instead of platesdeleted text end . (c) The veteran must have a certified copy of the veteran's discharge papers, indicating character of discharge, at the time of application. If an applicant served in the active military service in a branch of the armed forces of a nation or society allied with the United States in conducting a foreign war and is unable to obtain a record of that service and discharge status, the commissioner of veterans affairs may certify the applicant as qualified for the veterans' plates provided under this section. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.124, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. No fee. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end issue deleted text begin a set ofdeleted text end Medal of Honor plates to qualified applicants free of charge and the plates must be replaced without charge if they become damaged. deleted text begin In addition, no fee may be charged for a subsequent year when stickers are issued for a motor vehicle listed in subdivision 1 on which the Medal of Honor plates are placed.deleted text end The motor vehicle must be for personal use, not commercial purposes. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.125, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. No fee. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end issue deleted text begin a set ofdeleted text end EX-POW plates, or a single plate for a motorcycle, to qualified applicantsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end free of charge, and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end replace them without charge if they become damaged. deleted text begin In addition, no fee may be charged for a subsequent year when stickers are issued for that motor vehicle on which the EX-POW plates are placed.deleted text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.127, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Renewal of fleet registration. On the renewal of a fleet registration, the registrant must pay full licensing fees for every vehicle registered in the preceding year unless the vehicle has been properly deleted from the fleet. In order to delete a vehicle from a fleet, the fleet registrant must surrender to the commissioner the registration card and license plates. The commissioner may authorize alternative methods of deleting vehicles from a fleet, including destruction of the license plates and registration cards. If the card or license plates are lost or stolen, the fleet registrant must submit a sworn statement stating the circumstances for the inability to surrender the carddeleted text begin , stickers,deleted text end and license plates. A fleet registrant who fails to renew the licenses issued under this section or fails to report the removal of vehicles from the fleet within 30 days of the vehicles' removal must pay a penalty of 20 percent of the total tax due on the fleet. The penalty must be paid within 30 days after it is assessed. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.15, is amended to read: 168.15 RIGHTS AS TO REGISTRATION CERTIFICATE AND PLATES. Subdivision 1. Transfer of ownership. (a) Upon the transfer of ownership, destruction, theft, dismantling, or permanent removal by the owner from this state of any vehicle registered in accordance with this chapter, the right of the owner of the vehicle to use the registration certificate and plates assigned to the vehicle expires. (b) When the ownership of a vehicle is transferred to another person required to register the vehicle in this state, the transferor deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end assign the registration tax paid to the credit of the transferee unless the deleted text begin registration stickersdeleted text end new text begin license platesnew text end are surrendered to the commissioner before the first day of the new registration period. (c) When seeking to become the owner by gift, trade, or purchase of any vehicle for which a registration certificate has been issued under this chapter, a person deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end join with the registered owner in transmitting with the application for transfer of ownership, the registration certificate, with the assignment and notice of sale duly executed. (d) In case of loss of the title or certificate of registration of a vehicle not subject to section 325E.15, the person deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end make application to the commissioner with proof of loss of the title as specified in section 168A.09 and assign a notice of sale of the vehicle on the application for title as specified in section 168A.04. (e) Upon the transfer of any vehicle by a manufacturer or dealer, for use within the state, whether by sale, lease, or otherwise, the transferor deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end , within ten days after the transfer, file with the commissioner (1) a notice containing the date of transfer, a description of the vehicle, and the transferee's name and residence address in the state or if not a natural person then the transferee's business and mailing address, and (2) the transferee's application for registration. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.16, is amended to read: 168.16 REGISTRATION TAX REFUND; APPROPRIATION. (a) After the registration tax upon any vehicle has been paid for any registration period, refund must be made for errors made in computing the registration tax or fees and for the error on the part of an owner who may in error have registered a vehicle that was not before, nor at the time of registration, nor at any time thereafter during the preceding registration period, subject to registration tax in this state as provided by section 168.012. (b) Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, a claim for a refund of an overpayment of registration tax must be filed within 3-1/2 years from the date of payment. (c) The former registered owner of a transferred vehicle, by an assignment in writing endorsed upon the registration certificate and delivered to the commissioner within the time provided in this subdivision, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end assign, except for vehicles registered under section 168.187, to the new owner the right to have the tax paid by the former registered owner accredited to the new owner who duly registers the vehicle unless the deleted text begin registration stickersdeleted text end new text begin license platesnew text end are surrendered to the commissioner before the first day of the new registration period. (d) Any owner is entitled to a refund of the unused portion of the registration tax paid on the owner's vehicle upon filing a claim, verified by the commissioner, if the vehicle is: (1) declared by an insurance company to be permanently destroyed due to accident, fire, or an Act of God as defined in section 115B.02; or (2) sold to the federal government, the state, or a political subdivision of the state. (e) The refund must be equal to the sum of the remaining registration tax attributable for the registration period after the month in which the plates and certificate of registration or title were returned to the commissioner. (f) There is hereby appropriated to the persons entitled to a refund, from the fund or account in the state treasury to which the money was credited, an amount sufficient to make the refund and payment. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.187, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Registration of proratable vehicles. (a) The commissioner deleted text begin of public safety shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end register proratable vehicles of a fleet upon application and payment of registration fees as provided in subdivision 11. Payment of an additional fee for each vehicle so registered may be required by the commissioner in an amount not to exceed $5 per motor powered vehicle, for issuance of a platedeleted text begin , sticker,deleted text end or other suitable identification for each vehicle. A registration card deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be issued for each vehicle registereddeleted text begin , which shalldeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end appropriately deleted text begin identifydeleted text end new text begin identifiesnew text end the vehicle for which it is issued. deleted text begin Suchdeleted text end new text begin Thenew text end registration card deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be carried in or upon the vehicle for which it has been issued, at all times, except that the registration cards for all vehicles in a combination of vehicles may be carried in or upon the vehicle supplying the motive power. (b) Fleet vehicles registered as provided in paragraph (a) deleted text begin shall be deemeddeleted text end new text begin arenew text end fully registered in this state for any type of movement or operation, except that when a state grant of authority is required for any movement or operation, deleted text begin no such vehicle shalldeleted text end new text begin a vehicle must notnew text end be operated in this state unless the owner or operator deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end has been granted authority or rights therefore by the state and unless deleted text begin saiddeleted text end new text begin thenew text end vehicle is being operated in conformity with such authority or rights. No registration under this section deleted text begin shall excusedeleted text end new text begin excusesnew text end the owner or operator of any vehicle from compliance with the laws of this state, except those requiring registration and licensing. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.27, subdivision 28, is amended to read: Subd. 28. Distribution of plates deleted text begin and stickersdeleted text end . new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner may distribute deleted text begin registrationdeleted text end new text begin licensenew text end plates deleted text begin and stickersdeleted text end to be held and issued by new and used motor vehicle dealers. A dealer may issue deleted text begin registrationdeleted text end new text begin licensenew text end plates deleted text begin and stickersdeleted text end only in conjunction with the sale of a vehicle by the dealer. new text begin (b)new text end A dealer permitted to hold and issue deleted text begin registrationdeleted text end new text begin licensenew text end plates deleted text begin and stickersdeleted text end must be equipped with electronic transmission technology and trained in its use. Before receiving deleted text begin registrationdeleted text end new text begin licensenew text end plates deleted text begin and stickersdeleted text end under this subdivision, a dealer must adopt and implement security and record-keeping requirements satisfactory to the commissioner. new text begin (c)new text end The commissioner may revoke the authority granted under this subdivision for any violation of law or rule governing the issuance of deleted text begin registrationdeleted text end new text begin licensenew text end plates deleted text begin and stickersdeleted text end , any violation of the dealer's security and record-keeping plan, or any other action that in the commissioner's opinion adversely affects the registration system. The dealer is financially responsible for the cost and tax value of any unaccounted inventory. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.29, is amended to read: 168.29 REPLACEMENT PLATES. (a) In the event of the defacement, loss, or destruction of any deleted text begin numberdeleted text end new text begin licensenew text end plates deleted text begin or validation stickersdeleted text end , the commissionernew text begin must issue a new set of platesnew text end , upon receiving and filing a sworn statement of the vehicle owner, setting forth the circumstances of the defacement, loss, destruction, or theft deleted text begin of the number plates or validation stickersdeleted text end , together with any defaced plates deleted text begin or stickersdeleted text end and the payment of a fee calculated to cover the cost of replacementdeleted text begin , must issue a new set of plates or stickersdeleted text end . (b) A licensed motor vehicle dealer may only apply for replacement plates upon application for a certificate of title in the name of a new owner or the dealer. The commissioner must issue a new set of plates deleted text begin or validation stickersdeleted text end upon application for title and registration after removal of plates pursuant to section 168A.11, subdivision 2. (c) Plates issued under this section are subject to section 168.12 (d) The commissioner must note on the commissioner's records the issue of new deleted text begin numberdeleted text end new text begin licensenew text end plates and must attempt to cancel and call in the original plates so as to insure against their use on another motor vehicle. (e) Duplicate registration certificates plainly marked as duplicates may be issued in like cases upon the payment of a $1 fee. Fees collected under this section must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.31, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Installments; registration generally. (a) If the tax for a vehicle assessed under section 168.013, subdivision 1c, 1d, 1e, or 1g, amounts to more than $400, the owner may pay the tax by installments. (b) The owner shall tender with the application for registration one-third of the annual tax due or $400, whichever is greater, plus any penalties or arrears, plus a fee of $10. Instead of this fee, the applicant may furnish a bond, bank letter of credit, or certificate of deposit approved by the registrar of motor vehicles, for the total of the tax still due. The amount of the bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit may include any penalties assessed. The bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit must be for the benefit of the state for monetary loss caused by failure of the vehicle owner to pay delinquent license fees and penalties. (c) The remainder of the tax due must be paid in two equal installments. The due date of the first installment is July 1, and the second installment is due November 1. deleted text begin (d) When the applicant elects to pay the administrative fee, the registrar shall issue to the applicant validation stickers indicating the expiration date of a registration. When the applicant elects to furnish a bond, bank letter, or letter of deposit, the registrar shall issue regular validation stickers for the registration year. deleted text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end If an owner of a vehicle fails to pay an installment on or before its due date, the vehicle must not be used on the public streets or highways in this state until the installment or installments of the tax remaining due on the vehicle have been paid in full for the licensed year together with a penalty at the rate of $1 per day for the remainder of the month in which the balance of the tax becomes due and $4 a month for each succeeding month or fraction of a month during which the balance of the tax remains unpaid. Upon the payment of the balance of the tax and the penalties, the registrar shall issue a registration certificate to the owner of the vehicle in the manner provided by law. The registrar shall deny installment payment privileges provided in this subdivision in the subsequent year to any owner on any or all vehicles of the owner who during the current year fails to pay any installment due within one month after the due date. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168B.035, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Towing prohibited. (a) A towing authority may not tow a motor vehicle because: (1) the vehicle deleted text begin displaysdeleted text end registration deleted text begin validation stickers that havedeleted text end new text begin hasnew text end been expired for less than 90 days; (2) the vehicle is at a parking meter on which the time has expired; or (3) the vehicle is identified in conjunction with a citation to the vehicle owner or lessee for (i) a violation under section 169.06, subdivision 10, or (ii) a violation under section 169.14, subdivision 13. (b) A towing authority may tow a motor vehicle, notwithstanding paragraph (a), if: (1) the vehicle is parked in violation of snow emergency regulations; (2) the vehicle is parked in a rush-hour restricted parking area; (3) the vehicle is blocking a driveway, alley, or fire hydrant; (4) the vehicle is parked in a bus lane, or at a bus stop, during hours when parking is prohibited; (5) the vehicle is parked within 30 feet of a stop sign and visually blocking the stop sign; (6) the vehicle is parked in a disability transfer zone or disability parking space without a disability parking certificate or disability license plates; (7) the vehicle is parked in an area that has been posted for temporary restricted parking (i) at least 12 hours in advance in a home rule charter or statutory city having a population under 50,000, or (ii) at least 24 hours in advance in another political subdivision; (8) the vehicle is parked within the right-of-way of a controlled-access highway or within the traveled portion of a public street when travel is allowed there; (9) the vehicle is unlawfully parked in a zone that is restricted by posted signs to use by fire, police, public safety, or emergency vehicles; (10) the vehicle is unlawfully parked on property at the Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport owned by the Metropolitan Airports Commission; (11) a law enforcement official has probable cause to believe that the vehicle is stolen, or that the vehicle constitutes or contains evidence of a crime and impoundment is reasonably necessary to obtain or preserve the evidence; (12) the driver, operator, or person in physical control of the vehicle is taken into custody and the vehicle is impounded for safekeeping; (13) a law enforcement official has probable cause to believe that the owner, operator, or person in physical control of the vehicle has failed to respond to five or more citations for parking or traffic offenses; (14) the vehicle is unlawfully parked in a zone that is restricted by posted signs to use by taxicabs; (15) the vehicle is unlawfully parked and prevents egress by a lawfully parked vehicle; (16) the vehicle is parked, on a school day during prohibited hours, in a school zone on a public street where official signs prohibit parking; or (17) the vehicle is a junk, abandoned, or unauthorized vehicle, as defined in section 168B.011, and subject to immediate removal under this chapter. (c) A violation under section 169.06, subdivision 10, or 169.14, subdivision 13, is not a traffic offense under paragraph (b), clause (13). APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-04415 168.37 PLATE TABS OR STICKERS; MONTHLY REGISTRATION SYSTEM. Subd. 3. Design. The registrar may rearrange the words and figures on plates issued for vehicles under the monthly series system of registration to provide space on the plates for tabs or stickers which the registrar shall issue to indicate the period of registration. 169.219 PUBLIC SERVICE ANNOUNCEMENTS. The commissioner of public safety shall include in the department's series of public service announcements information that educates the public about traffic regulations that are frequently violated, including the requirement for a vehicle driver to stop to yield the right-of-way to a pedestrian in a crosswalk. The commissioner shall distribute these announcements for broadcast in this state on radio and television. 169.48 VEHICLE LIGHTING. Subdivision 1. Lights to be displayed. (a) Every vehicle upon a highway within this state: (1) at any time from sunset to sunrise; (2) at any time when it is raining, snowing, sleeting, or hailing; and (3) at any other time when visibility is impaired by weather, smoke, fog or other conditions or there is not sufficient light to render clearly discernible persons and vehicles on the highway at a distance of 500 feet ahead; shall display lighted headlamps, lighted tail lamps, and illuminating devices, as hereinafter, respectively, required for different classes of vehicles, subject to exceptions with respect to parked vehicles and law enforcement vehicles, as hereinafter stated. In addition to the other requirements of this paragraph, every school bus transporting children upon a highway within this state, at any time from a half hour before sunrise to a half hour after sunset, shall display lighted headlamps, lighted tail lamps, and illuminating devices as required by this paragraph, except that the operator shall use the lowermost distribution of light specified in section 169.60 unless conditions warrant otherwise. (b) When requirement is hereinafter declared as to the distance from which certain lamps and devices shall render objects visible or within which such lamps or devices shall be visible, these provisions shall apply during the time stated in this section upon a straight level unlighted highway under normal atmospheric conditions unless a different time or condition is expressly stated and unless otherwise specified the location of lamps and devices shall refer to the center of such lamps or devices. Parking lamps shall not be used in lieu of headlamps to satisfy the requirements of this section. Subd. 2. Certain violations; negligence. Notwithstanding section 169.96, a violation of subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), is not negligence per se or prima facie evidence of negligence. 169.49 HEADLAMPS. (a) Every motor vehicle other than a motorcycle must be equipped with at least two headlamps, including at least one on each side of the front of the motor vehicle. Headlamps must comply with the requirements and limitations set forth in sections 169.47 to 169.66. (b) Every motorcycle must be equipped with at least one and not more than four headlamps, which must comply with the requirements and limitations of sections 169.47 to 169.66. 169.50 REAR LAMPS. Subdivision 1. Requirements; exception. (a) Every motor vehicle and every vehicle that is being drawn at the end of a train of vehicles must be equipped with at least one tail lamp, exhibiting a red light plainly visible from a distance of 500 feet to the rear. (b) Every motor vehicle, other than a truck-tractor, and every vehicle that is being drawn at the end of a train of vehicles, registered in this state and manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1960, must be equipped with at least two tail lamps mounted on the rear and on the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable. When lighted, the tail lamps must comply with the provisions of this section. (c) An implement of husbandry being towed by a motor vehicle at a speed of not more than 30 miles per hour, displaying a slow-moving vehicle emblem, and complying with section 169.55, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (4), is not subject to the requirements of this section. Subd. 2. License plates. Either such rear lamp or separate lamp shall be so constructed and placed as to illuminate with a white light the rear registration plate and render it legible from a distance of 50 feet to the rear. Any rear lamp or rear lamps, together with any separate lamp for illuminating the rear registration plate, shall be so wired as to be lighted whenever the headlamps or auxiliary driving lamps are lighted. Subd. 3. Reflectors. On and after January 1, 1960, each new motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, hereafter sold and each such vehicle hereafter operated on a highway, shall carry at the rear either as a part of the rear lamp, or separately, at least two reflectors. The reflectors shall be of a type approved by the commissioner of public safety and shall be mounted as close as is practicable to the extreme edges of the vehicle at a height not more than 60, nor less than 20 inches above the surface upon which the vehicle stands. Each such reflector shall be so designed and maintained as to be visible at night from all distances within 300 to 50 feet from the vehicle, except that on a commercial vehicle the reflectors shall be visible from all distances within 500 to 50 feet from the vehicle, when directly in front of a motor vehicle displaying lawfully lighted headlamps. 169.55 LIGHTS ON ALL VEHICLES. Subdivision 1. Lights or reflectors required. At the times when lighted lamps on vehicles are required each vehicle including an animal-drawn vehicle and any vehicle specifically excepted in sections 169.47 to 169.79, with respect to equipment and not previously required to be equipped with lamps, must be equipped with one or more lighted lamps or lanterns projecting a white light visible from a distance of 500 feet to the front of the vehicle and with a lamp or lantern exhibiting a red light visible from a distance of 500 feet to the rear, except that reflectors meeting the maximum requirements of this chapter may be used in lieu of the lights required in this subdivision. 169.56 AUXILIARY LIGHTS. Subdivision 1. Spotlight. Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed two spot lamps and every lighted spot lamp shall be so aimed and used upon approaching another vehicle that no part of the high-intensity portion of the beam will be directed on the road surface to the left of the center of the vehicle, nor more than 100 feet ahead of the vehicle upon which such lamps are mounted. Subd. 2. Fog light. Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed two fog lamps mounted on the front at a height not less than 12 inches nor more than 30 inches above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands and so aimed that when the vehicle is not loaded none of the high-intensity portion of the light to the left of the center of the vehicle shall at a distance of 25 feet ahead project higher than a level of four inches below the level of the center of the lamp from which it comes. Lighted fog lamps meeting the above requirements may be used with lower headlamp beams as specified in section 169.60. Subd. 3. Auxiliary low-beam light. Except as provided in subdivision 5, any motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed two auxiliary low-beam lamps mounted on the front at a height of not less than 24 inches nor more than 42 inches above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands. The provisions of section 169.60 shall apply to any combination of headlamps and auxiliary low-beam lamps. Subd. 4. Auxiliary driving light. Except as provided in subdivision 5, any motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed two auxiliary driving lamps mounted on the front at a height not less than 16 inches nor more than 42 inches above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands. The provisions of section 169.60 shall apply to any combination of headlamps and auxiliary driving lamps. Subd. 5. Exception for light obstructed by snowplow blade. (a) The auxiliary lamps permitted in subdivision 3 may be mounted more than 42 inches high on any truck equipped with a snowplow blade that obstructs the required headlights. The lights may not be illuminated when a snowplow blade is not mounted on the vehicle. (b) No other vehicle may be operated on a public highway unless the auxiliary lamps permitted in subdivisions 3 and 4 comply with the height requirements or are completely covered with an opaque material. Subd. 6. Motorcycle ground light. Notwithstanding section 169.64, subdivision 4a, a motorcycle may be equipped with white ground lights mounted under the motorcycle if: (1) the bulbs or strips are not visible to operators of other vehicles; and (2) the lights are aimed so as to project a steady, nonflashing beam not more than six feet in radius directly onto the roadway and illuminate an area around the motorcycle. 169.57 VEHICLE SIGNALS. Subd. 3. Maintenance. (a) When a vehicle is equipped with stop lamps or signal lamps, the lamps must at all times be maintained in good working condition. (b) All mechanical signal devices must be self-illumined when in use at the times when lighted lamps on vehicles are required. 169.59 WARNING LIGHTS. Subdivision 1. Fender lights. Any vehicle may be equipped with not more than two side cowl or fender lamps, one on each side which shall emit a white light without glare. Subd. 2. Running board light. Any vehicle may be equipped with not more than one running board courtesy lamp on each side thereof, which shall emit a white or yellow light without glare. 169.61 COMPOSITE BEAM. (a) When a motor vehicle is being operated on a highway or shoulder adjacent thereto during the times when lighted lamps on vehicles are required in this chapter, the driver shall use a distribution of light, or composite beam, directed high enough and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a safe distance in advance of the vehicle, subject to the following requirements and limitations. (b) When the driver of a vehicle approaches a vehicle within 1,000 feet, such driver shall use a distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed that the glaring rays are not projected into the eyes of the oncoming driver. (c) When the driver of a vehicle follows another vehicle within 200 feet to the rear, except when engaged in the act of overtaking and passing, such driver shall use a distribution of light permissible under this chapter other than the uppermost distribution of light specified in section 169.60. 169.63 NUMBER OF LAMPS. (a) At all times when lighted lamps on vehicles are required in this chapter, at least two lighted headlamps shall be displayed, one on each side at the front of every motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle; provided, that under adverse weather conditions two lighted auxiliary lamps, one on each side at the front of the vehicle, may be used in lieu of two lighted headlamps, except when such vehicle is parked subject to the rules governing lights on parked vehicles. (b) When a motor vehicle equipped with headlamps, as herein required, is also equipped with any auxiliary lamps, spot lamps or any other lamps on the front thereof projecting a beam of intensity greater than 300-candle power, not more than a total of four of any such lamps on the front of a vehicle shall be lighted at any one time when upon a highway. (c) The maximum beam candle power from any combination of lamps used at any time for road lighting shall not exceed that authorized by the commissioner of public safety. 169.65 SPECIFICATIONS FOR LIGHTING AND OTHER DEVICES. (a) The commissioner of public safety is hereby authorized and required to adopt and enforce standard specifications as to the amount, color and direction of light to be emitted or reflected by lighting devices and as to the general construction and mounting on the vehicle for compliance with the requirements and limitations of this chapter. (b) No person shall have for sale, sell, or offer for sale for use upon or as a part of the equipment of a vehicle, trailer or semitrailer, or use upon any such vehicle, any headlamp, auxiliary driving lamp, rear lamp, signal lamp, spot lamp, clearance lamp, marker lamp or reflector, or parts of any of the foregoing, unless of a type which has been submitted to and approved by the commissioner of public safety. (c) No person shall have for sale, sell, or offer for sale for use upon or as a part of the equipment of a vehicle, trailer or semitrailer, or bicycle, or use upon any such vehicle, any lamp or device mentioned in this section, which has been approved by the commissioner of public safety unless such lamp or device bears thereon the trademark or name and model designation all permanently marked under which it is approved so as to be legible when installed. (d) No person shall use upon any vehicle, trailer or semitrailer or bicycle any lamps mentioned in this section unless such lamps are equipped with bulbs of a type approved by the commissioner of public safety, having a rated candle power, and are mounted and adjusted as to focus and aim in accordance with instructions of the commissioner of public safety. (e) The commissioner of public safety is hereby authorized to approve or disapprove lighting devices. (f) The commissioner of public safety is hereby required to approve or disapprove any lighting device, of a type on which approval is specifically required in this chapter, within a reasonable time after such device has been submitted. (g) The commissioner of public safety is further authorized to set up a procedure which shall be followed when any device is submitted for approval. (h) The commissioner of public safety is authorized to set and collect a reasonable fee for the testing and approval of all types of devices upon which approval is required in this chapter. Such fee may be sufficient in amount to reimburse the Department of Public Safety for all costs connected with such test and approval. (i) The commissioner of public safety, upon approving any such lamp or device, shall issue to the applicant a certificate of approval, together with any instructions determined by the commissioner of public safety. (j) The commissioner of public safety shall publish lists of all lamps and devices by name and type which have been approved by the commissioner of public safety, together with instructions as to the permissible candlepower rating of the bulbs which the commissioner of public safety has determined for use therein and such other instructions as to adjustment as the commissioner of public safety may deem necessary. No person shall sell for use or use on any vehicle any reconverted lamp or any device redesigned for a use other than for which it was originally approved unless authorized by the commissioner of public safety. 169.66 HEARING ON SPECIFICATIONS. (a) With reason to believe that an approved device which is being sold commercially does not comply with the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner of public safety may, after giving 30 days' previous notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for such device in this state, conduct a hearing upon the question of compliance of the approved device. After the hearing the commissioner of public safety shall determine whether the approved device meets the requirements of this chapter. If it does not meet the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner of public safety shall give notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for such device in this state. (b) If, at the expiration of 90 days after such notice, the person holding the certificate of approval for such device has failed to satisfy the commissioner of public safety that the approved device as thereafter to be sold meets the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner of public safety shall suspend or revoke the approval issued therefor until or unless such device is resubmitted to and retested by an authorized testing agency and is found to meet the requirements of this chapter, and may require that all such devices sold since the notification following the hearing be replaced with devices that do comply with the requirements of this chapter. The commissioner of public safety may at the time of the retest purchase in the open market and submit to the testing agency one or more sets of such approved devices, and if such device upon such retest fails to meet the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner of public safety may refuse to renew the certificate of approval of such device. 169.69 MUFFLER. Every motor vehicle shall at all times be equipped with a muffler in good working order which blends the exhaust noise into the overall vehicle noise and is in constant operation to prevent excessive or unusual noise, and no person shall use a muffler cutout, bypass, or similar device upon a motor vehicle on a street or highway. The exhaust system shall not emit or produce a sharp popping or crackling sound. Every motor vehicle shall at all times be equipped with such parts and equipment so arranged and kept in such state of repair as to prevent carbon monoxide gas from entering the interior of the vehicle. No person shall have for sale, sell or offer for sale or use on any motor vehicle any muffler that fails to comply with the specifications as required by the commissioner of public safety. 169.693 MOTOR VEHICLE NOISE LIMITS. It is unlawful to operate a motor vehicle in violation of motor vehicle noise rules adopted by the Pollution Control Agency. 169.71 WINDSHIELD. Subd. 2. Windshield wiper. The windshield on every motor vehicle shall be equipped with a device for cleaning rain, snow or other moisture from the windshield, which device shall be so constructed as to be controlled or operated by the driver of the vehicle. Subd. 3. Defrosting requirement. No person shall drive any motor vehicle with the windshield or front side windows covered with steam or frost to such an extent as to prevent proper vision. 169.79 VEHICLE REGISTRATION; DISPLAYING LICENSE PLATES. Subd. 8. Plate registration stickers. As viewed facing the plates: (a) License plates issued to vehicles registered under section 168.017 must display the month of expiration in the lower left corner of each plate and the year of expiration in the lower right corner of each plate. (b) License plates issued to vehicles registered under section 168.127 must display either fleet registration validation stickers in the lower right corner of each plate or distinctive license plates, issued by the registrar, with "FLEET REG" displayed on the bottom center portion of each plate. (c) License plates issued after July 1, 2008, requiring validation must display the month of expiration in the lower left corner of each plate and the year of expiration in the lower right corner of the plate. 169.974 OPERATION OF MOTORCYCLE; MOTOR SCOOTER; MOTOR BIKE. Subd. 7. Noise limits. After December 31, 1978, noise rules adopted by the Pollution Control Agency for motor vehicles pursuant to section 169.693 shall also apply to motorcycles. 169.98 POLICE, PATROL, OR SECURITY GUARD VEHICLE. Subd. 5. Vehicle security barrier; exemption. Marked State Patrol vehicles are exempt from compliance with any rule requiring a security barrier between the front and rear seats of the vehicle. A State Patrol vehicle shall be equipped with a security barrier at the option of the officer assigned the vehicle.